Utah statutes.
63G-6-205.   Delegation of authority.
Subject to rules and regulations, the chief procurement officer may delegate
authority to designees or to any department, agency, or official.  For a
procurement process under Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 26, Government
Procurement Private Proposal Program, any delegation by the chief procurement
officer under this section shall be made to the Governor's Office of Economic
Development.
